Massachusetts, session 194th, S972.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 30 of Chapter 23B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following paragraph after the first
paragraph:-
The executive office shall prioritize access to emergency shelter assistance for the
following groups, in the following order of priority: (1) veterans as defined by section 1 of
chapter 115; (2) elderly persons as defined in section 14 of chapter 19A; and (3) families with
legal residence in the Commonwealth who are homeless or at risk of homelessness, as defined by
regulations promulgated by the executive office.
of 1